District of Columbia statutes.
17-306

Determination of appeals.

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals may affirm, modify, vacate, set aside or reverse any order or judgment of a court or any division or branch thereof, or any administrative order or decision, lawfully brought before it for review, and may remand the cause and direct the entry of such appropriate order, judgment, or decision, or require such further proceedings to be had, as is just in the circumstances.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 615, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 146(a)(6)
1981 Ed., § 17-306.
1973 Ed., § 17-306.